Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.129

Investment in obligations issued or guaranteed by multilateral development bank.

Any bank may invest in obligations issued or guaranteed by any multilateral development bank in which the United States government formally participates. Such investment in any one multilateral development bank shall not exceed five percent of the bank's paid-in capital and surplus.

[ 2014 c 37 s 114; 1985 c 301 s 2. Formerly RCW 30.04.129.]